Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska42-1009
Application and construction.

The Uniform Premarital Agreement Act shall be applied and construed to effectuate its general purpose to make uniform the law with respect to the subject of the act among states enacting it.

Laws 1994, LB 202, § 9.